Twol/skf-phon.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Sakirabiá morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! =================================== !

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
 ã ẽ ĩ õ ũ
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ý ç

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
 Ã Ẽ Ĩ Õ Ũ
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ö Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ý Ç

 ' ! the apostrophe is a glotal stop marker

!! Archiconsonants
%{pb%}:p !
%{pb%}:b
%{tr%}:t
%{tr%}:r
%{kg%}:k
%{kg%}:g
%{bmØ%}:b
%{bmØ%}:m
%{bmØ%}:0
%{õo%}:õ
%{õo%}:o

%{eV%}:e
%{eØ%}:e
%{eØ%}:0

! triggers
%^WG:0

! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <


 %>
 %<
 #
 «
 »

  ;

Sets

 Vow = a e i o u y ã ẽ ĩ õ ũ ; 
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ;
 
Rules

!"Vowel lengthening at morpheme boundary"
!Vx:Vy <=> Vy %^WG: %> _ ;
!     where Vx in (%{eV%} %{eV%} %{eV%} %{eV%} %{eV%} %{eV%} %{eV%} %{eV%} %{eV%} %{eV%} )
!           Vy in (   a      e      i      o      u      ã      ẽ      ĩ      õ      ũ   ) matched ;
 
" %{eV%}:o"
 %{eV%}:o <=> o %^WG: %> _ ;
!!

"Weaken stem-final stop when followed by morpheme on-set vowel"
Cx:Cy <=> _ %^WG:0 [ %> | %< ];
     where Cx in (%{pb%} %{tr%} %{kg%})
           Cy in (   b      r      g ) matched ;

!! tek+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1
!!€ o%<te%{kg%}%^WG%>%{bmØ%}%{õo%}
!!€ o%<teg0%>0õ

"%{eØ%}:0 loss following stem-final vowel"
 %{eØ%}:0 <=> Vow %^WG:0 %> _ ;
!! 


!!TESTS
!echo 'o < o p o ^WG:0 > %{eV%}:o r i' | hfst-pair-test src/phonology/skf-phon.compose.hfst
!echo 'opo+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1' | hfst-lookup src/morphology/lexicon.hfst
